District of Columbia statutes.
31-803

Repealed

General license requirements.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-227, § 4, 44 DCR 140
Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-188, § 2(a), 47 DCR 7075
Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-264, § 20, 50 DCR 260
1981 Ed., § 35-1323.